District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1210.32

Grants.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7183, 61 DCR 9990
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 7024(f), 62 DCR 10905

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) addition of D.C. Law 20-155, § 7185, see § 2(u)( 2) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-179, March 7, 2015, 62 DCR 424).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of a provision concerning funding of the Emerging Business District Demonstration Projects grant program, see § 7185 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 20-155, § 7185, concerning funding of the Emerging Business District Demonstration Projects grant program, see § 2(p) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-461, November 6, 2014, 61 DCR 11784, 20 STAT 4368).
For temporary (90 days) addition of a provision concerning funding of the Emerging Business District Demonstration Projects grant program, see § 7185 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 20-155, § 7185, concerning funding of the Emerging Business District Demonstration Projects grant program, see § 2(p) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-587, January 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1294, 21 STAT 758).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-155, §§ 7182 and 7183, see § 7016(z)(5) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).